Louisiana, session 2026, HB632.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:3138.12(E), (F), and (H)(2) are hereby amended and reenacted
and R.S. 17:3914(P) and 3996(B)(24) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§3138.12. Louisiana's Foundational Integrated Research System for Transformation
(LA FIRST)
* * *
E. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, LA FIRST, through
the Board of Regents, shall be provided access to all data listed in the data-sharing
agreement developed with each state entity. Access to the data of each entity listed
in Paragraph (C)(1) of this Section shall be provided through the office of technology
services on equipment provided by the office of technology services. Once the
Kathleen Babineaux Blanco Public Policy Center has been provided access to the
data, the policy center shall comply with all restrictions imposed by law on any of
the data received that is deemed confidential, privileged, or otherwise restricted, and
any reports that use the data shall be released or published only in a manner that
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 632 ENROLLED
complies with the restrictions. Under no circumstances shall data housed in the LA
FIRST data system be sold to third parties.
F.(1) For the purposes of this Section, "personal information" means a
person's social security number, full name, and date of birth, and "nonpersonal
information" means all other data housed in the LA FIRST data system.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of R.S. 17:3914 or any other law to the
contrary, each city, parish, or other local public school board public school
governing authority shall directly share, at least annually, student data with the
Kathleen Babineaux Blanco Public Policy Center and any department listed in
Subsection C of this Section in order to carry out the provisions of this Section and
the goals of the data-sharing agreements. for use in the LA FIRST data system.
(3)(a) To facilitate the sharing of a portion of this student personal
information, each public school governing authority shall directly share personal
information for high school students with the state Department of Education, which
shall share such information with the Kathleen Babineaux Blanco Public Policy
Center in order to carry out the provisions of this Section.
(b) The state Department of Education may develop and implement a
streamlined information sharing process for the purposes of this Subsection,
including but not limited to the incorporation of the information sharing
requirements of this Subsection into any other data-sharing agreements it has with
public school governing authorities, the Kathleen Babineaux Blanco Public Policy
Center, or any other state entity as provided in this Section or in any other provision
of law.
(c) The state Department of Education shall develop and implement a
process for parents to opt out of the information sharing process provided for in
Subparagraph (a) of this Paragraph upon registration as part of an existing data
sharing information notice or parental consent process.
* * *
H.
* * *
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 632 ENROLLED
(2) The shared data shall be separated into two parts, personal and
nonpersonal information. Personal information and nonpersonal information shall
be transferred and stored separately. Personal information shall be used only to
generate a unique identifier for each record, which shall then be combined with
nonpersonal information to allow for matching of records across the data system or
to produce generalized or aggregated information to support analysis. A limited set
of nonpersonal information may be incorporated into the matching process.
Research and analysis shall not be conducted on data that includes personally
identifiable personal information.
* * *
§3914. Student information; privacy; legislative intent; definitions; prohibitions;
parental access; penalties
* * *
P. Notwithstanding any provision of this Section to the contrary, each public
school governing authority shall share personal information as defined in R.S.
17:3138.12 matched to unique student identification numbers with the state
Department of Education, which shall share the information as provided in R.S.
17:3138.12(F) for purposes of Louisiana's Foundational Integrated Research System
for Transformation.
* * *
§3996. Charter schools; exemptions; requirements
* * *
B. Notwithstanding any state law, rule, or regulation to the contrary and
except as may be otherwise specifically provided for in an approved charter, a
charter school established and operated in accordance with the provisions of this
Chapter and its approved charter and the school's officers and employees shall be
exempt from all statutory mandates or other statutory requirements that are
applicable to public schools and to public school officers and employees except for
the following laws otherwise applicable to public schools with the same grades:
* * *
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 632 ENROLLED
(24) Student information sharing, R.S. 17:3138.12.
* * *
Section 2. This Act shall become effective on November 30, 2026.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.